Indiana, session 2026, HB1396.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-7-3-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.126-2011,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. (a) Section 2 of this chapter applies only to
areas subject to the jurisdiction of no plan commission under this
article.
(b) Sections 3 through 9 of this chapter apply only to:
(1) areas subject to the jurisdiction of an advisory plan
commission under this article; and
(2) areas subject to the jurisdiction of no plan commission under
this article.
(c) Sections 10, 14, and 16 of this chapter apply to all areas of the
state.
(d) Sections 12, 13, and 15 of this chapter apply to all areas of the
state, except in a county having a consolidated city.
(e) Section 12.5 of this chapter applies to all areas of the state.
SECTION 2. IC 36-7-3-12.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
2026 IN 1396—LS 7116/DI 150


1, 2026]: Sec. 12.5. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), on the
twentieth anniversary of the vacation of a right-of-way, the
following are extinguished:
(1) An easement or encumbrance on or within the
right-of-way.
(2) All rights relating to or in reliance on an easement or
encumbrance described in subdivision (1).
(b) Subsection (a) does not apply to an easement or
encumbrance granted in writing by the owner of the land
previously constituting the right-of-way.
2026 IN 1396—LS 7116/DI 150